Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.010

Definitions—"System of sewerage," "public utility."

A "system of sewerage" means and may include any or all of the following:

(1) Sanitary sewage collection, treatment, and/or disposal facilities and services, on-site or off-site sanitary sewerage facilities, inspection services and maintenance services for public or private on-site systems, or any other means of sewage treatment and disposal approved by the city;

(2) Combined sanitary sewage disposal and storm or surface water sewers;

(3) Storm or surface water sewers;

(4) Outfalls for storm drainage or sanitary sewage and works, plants, and facilities for storm drainage or sanitary sewage treatment and disposal, and rights and interests in property relating to the system;

(5) Combined water and sewerage systems;

(6) Point and nonpoint water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the sewerage facilities and programs operated by a city or town;

(7) Public restroom and sanitary facilities; and

(8) Any combination of or part of any or all of such facilities.

The words "public utility" when used in this chapter has the same meaning as the words "system of sewerage."

[ 1997 c 447 s 7; 1965 c 110 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.67.010. Prior: 1955 c 266 s 2; prior: 1941 c 193 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-4, part.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—1997 c 447: See note following RCW 70.05.074.